Tennessee, session 114, SB0151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 20, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each local board of education and governing body of a public charter school,
as defined in § 49-13-104, shall require all schools in the LEA and the public charter
school to display the Ten Commandments, the first sentence of the second paragraph of
the preamble to the Declaration of Independence, and the preamble to the United States
Constitution in a prominent location in each school building in order to educate students
on the significance of the Ten Commandments to the principles and ideals of the United
States of America, as established in its founding documents.
(b) Fraternal and other organizations or individuals are encouraged to donate
the funds or materials necessary for the display required in subsection (a).
(c) Each local board of education and governing body of a public charter school
shall determine the size and placement of the display required in subsection (a);
provided, that the items described in subsection (a) must be displayed together,
prominently, with text displayed in a font size no smaller than least twenty-six (26) point
and in a style and manner that is easy for students to see and read.
(d) As used in subsection (a), "prominent location" means a school entryway,
cafeteria, or common area where students are likely to see the display.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
SB0151
001225
- 1 -